Nevada, session 83, AB27.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 286.520 is hereby amended to read as follows:
286.520 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 286.525, the consequences of the employment of a retired
employee are:
(a) A retired employee who accepts employment or an
independent contract with a public employer under this System is
disqualified from receiving any allowances under this System for
the duration of that employment or contract if:
(1) The retired employee accepted the employment or
contract within 90 calendar days after the effective date of the
employee’s retirement; or
(2) The retired employee is employed in a position which is
eligible to participate in this System.
(b) If a retired employee accepts employment or an independent
contract with a public employer under this System more than 90
calendar days after the effective date of the employee’s retirement in
a position which is not eligible to participate in this System, the
employee’s allowance under this System terminates upon the
employee’s earning an amount equal to one-half of the average
salary for participating public employees who are not police officers
or firefighters in any fiscal year, for the duration of that employment
or contract.
(c) If a retired employee accepts employment with an employer
who is not a public employer under this System, the employee is
entitled to the same allowances as a retired employee who has no
employment.
2. The retired employee and the public employer shall notify
the System:
(a) Within 10 days after the first day of an employment or
contract governed by paragraph (a) of subsection 1.
(b) Within 30 days after the first day of an employment or
contract governed by paragraph (b) of subsection 1.
-
*AB27*

– 3 –
(c) Within 10 days after a retired employee earns more than one-
half of the average salary for participating public employees who
are not police officers or firefighters in any fiscal year from an
employment or contract governed by paragraph (b) of subsection 1.
3. For the purposes of this section, the average salary for
participating public employees who are not police officers or
firefighters must be computed on the basis of the most recent
actuarial valuation of the System.
4. If a retired employee who accepts employment or an
independent contract with a public employer under this System
pursuant to this section elects not to reenroll in the System pursuant
to subsection 1 of NRS 286.525, the public employer with which the
retired employee accepted employment or an independent contract
may pay contributions on behalf of the retired employee to a
retirement fund which is not a part of the System in an amount not
to exceed the amount of the contributions that the public employer
would pay to the System on behalf of a participating public
employee who is employed in a similar position.
5. If a retired employee is chosen by election or appointment to
fill an elective public office, the retired employee is entitled to the
same allowances as a retired employee who has no employment,
unless the retired employee is serving in the same office in which
the retired employee served and for which the retired employee
received service credit as a member. A public employer may pay
contributions on behalf of such a retired employee to a retirement
fund which is not a part of the System in an amount not to exceed
the amount of the contributions that the public employer would pay
to the System on behalf of a participating public employee who
serves in the same office.
6. The System may waive for one period of 30 days or less a
retired employee’s disqualification under this section if the public
employer certifies in writing, in advance, that the retired employee
is recalled to meet an emergency and that no other qualified person
is immediately available.
7. A person who accepts employment or an independent
contract with:
(a) Either house of the Legislature or the Legislative Counsel
Bureau;
(b) The Nevada Gaming Commission as a Commissioner
appointed by the Governor; or
(c) The Nevada Court System as a senior justice, senior judge,
senior justice of the peace or senior municipal judge,
 is exempt from the provisions of subsections 1 and 2 for the
duration of that employment or contract.
-
*AB27*

– 4 –
8. A person who accepts employment with a volunteer fire
department of which all the volunteers have become members of the
System pursuant to NRS 286.367 is exempt from the provisions of
subsections 1 and 2 for the duration of that employment.
9. A person who accepts employment or an independent
contract to fill a full-time position that is eligible for membership
with a public employer under this System that is a city whose
population is less than 25,000 or a county whose population is less
than 100,000 is exempt from the provisions of subsections 1 and 2
for the duration of that employment or contract if:
(a) The person previously had not been employed by or entered
into an independent contract with the public employer;
(b) At the time at which the person accepts the employment or
contract with the public employer, the public employer does not
employ or have an independent contract with more than four
persons who are exempt from the provisions of subsections 1 and
2 pursuant to this subsection; and
(c) The person does not reenroll in the System.
 The public employer of a person who is exempt from the
provisions of subsections 1 and 2 pursuant to this subsection shall
pay contributions to the System in relation to the exemption for
the duration of the person’s employment or contract at the total
contribution rate that the public employer would pay for a
participating public employee who is employed in a similar
position and elected to have the employee’s portion of the
contribution paid by the public employer.
H
-
*AB27*